Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Life Insurance

18A.205.
Life insurance for state employees and certain retirees — Definitions.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, upon the recommendation of the secretary, may procure from one (1) or more life insurance companies, authorized to do business in this state, a policy or policies of group life insurance insuring the lives of all or any class or classes of public employees. The policy or policies shall be approved by the commissioner of insurance and may contain such provisions as the commissioner of insurance approves whether or not otherwise permitted by the insurance laws. It is intended that life insurance may be made available for public employees, except that the procuring is permissive.

As used in KRS

18A.205

to

18A.215

, “public employee” shall mean a person who:

Is regularly employed by a public employer; and

Is also:

A contributing member of any one (1) of the state-administered retirement systems;

A retiree of a state-administered retirement system who is employed in a regular full-time position for purposes of retirement coverage, but who is not eligible to contribute to one (1) of the systems administered by Kentucky Retirement Systems or County Employees Retirement System pursuant to KRS 61.637(17) or 78.5540(4);

An individual participating in an optional retirement plan authorized by KRS

161.567

; or

An individual eligible to participate in a retirement plan established by an employer who ceases participating in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System pursuant to KRS

61.522

whose employees participated in the life insurance plans administered by the Personnel Cabinet prior to the employer’s effective cessation date in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System.

Notwithstanding the definition of “public employee” in this subsection, any federally funded time-limited employee may receive insurance coverage.

As used in this section and KRS

18A.210

, “public employer” shall mean the following employers, if the employer has opted to participate in the state-sponsored group life insurance program:

Any department, office, board, agency, commission, authority, or branch of state government;

A public postsecondary educational institution;

Any department, office, board, agency, commission, authority, or branch of a city, urban-county, charter county, county, unified local government, or consolidated local government; or

Any certified or classified employee or elected member of a local board of education.

As used in KRS

18A.205

to

18A.225

, “premiums” shall mean premiums to be paid on any type of insurance authorized under KRS

18A.205

to

18A.225

.

HISTORY:

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 41, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 23, § 6, effective July 13, 1984; 1998, ch. 154, § 44, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 24, § 26, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 52, § 1, effective June 8, 2011; 2018 ch. 80, § 1, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 4, effective July 14, 2019; 2020 ch. 79, § 14, effective April 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 102, § 39, effective April 1, 2021.

18A.210.
Payment of premiums.

The premiums may be paid by the policyholder:

Wholly from funds contributed by the insured public employee, by payroll deduction or otherwise;

Wholly from funds contributed by the public employer; or

Partly from each.

No payment of premium by the public employer shall constitute compensation to an insured public employee for the purposes of any statute fixing or limiting the compensation of such an employee; any premium or other expense incurred by the public employer shall be considered a proper cost of administration.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 225, §
2; repealed and reenact., Acts 1982, ch. 448, § 42, effective July 15, 1982; 2018 ch. 80, § 2, effective July 14, 2018.

18A.215.
Provisions authorized.

The policy or policies may also provide accidental death and dismemberment insurance and may contain such provisions with respect to the class or classes of public employees covered, amounts of insurance for designated classes or groups of public employees, terms of eligibility, continuation of insurance after retirement, and such other provisions as the commissioner of insurance may approve.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 225, §
3; repealed and reenact., Acts 1982, ch. 448, § 43, effective July 15, 1982; 2010, ch. 24, § 27, effective July 15, 2010; 2018 ch. 80, § 3, effective July 14, 2018.

18A.220.
Authority of secretary.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet is authorized to perform all acts necessary or advisable for the purpose of contracting for and maintaining insurance under the provisions of KRS

18A.205

to

18A.225

.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 44, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 5, § 6, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 82, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2001, ch. 164, § 2, effective June 21, 2001.